Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-245
Deeds and other instruments; where recorded.

Deeds and other instruments relating to or affecting the title of real estate in this state shall be recorded in the county in which such real estate, or any part thereof, is situated.

R.S.1866, c. 43, § 21, p. 284;

R.S.1913, § 6215;

C.S.1922, § 5614;

C.S.1929, § 76-220;

R.S.1943, § 76-245.

Recording fees, see section 33-109.